trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="deliri/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ton__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gem__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>merna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="organ/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="foul__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="p__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>p</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="status__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lire__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ordal__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nom/en__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>enet</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enen</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="scar/f__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fen</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>far</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ves</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ves</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>farna</l>     <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vesen</l>     <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="foul">            <i>foul</i><par n="foul__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kiloton">         <i>kiloton</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="spin">            <i>spin</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="joule">           <i>joule</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nettoregisterton"><i>nettoregisterton</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="libyer">          <i>libyer</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="rottweiler">      <i>rottweiler</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="abessinier">      <i>abessinier</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="d">               <i>d</i><par n="d__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="cornichon">       <i>cornichon</i><par n="foul__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ordal">           <i>ordal</i><par n="ordal__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="megajoule">       <i>megajoule</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="scarf">           <i>scar</i><par n="scar/f__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="diagnostiker">    <i>diagnostiker</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sumerer">         <i>sumerer</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="personkilometer"> <i>personkilometer</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gartner">         <i>gartner</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="p">               <i>p</i><par n="p__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sekundmeter">     <i>sekundmeter</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="finmekaniker">    <i>finmekaniker</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="litteraturkritiker"><i>litteraturkritiker</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="backup">          <i>backup</i><par n="foul__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gigaton">         <i>gigaton</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="nomen">           <i>nom</i><par n="nom/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="addenda">         <i>addenda</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pykniker">        <i>pykniker</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="candela">         <i>candela</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bruttoregisterton"><i>bruttoregisterton</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="agnostiker">      <i>agnostiker</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="backupp">         <i>backupp</i><par n="foul__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="penni">           <i>penni</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bungalow">        <i>bungalow</i><par n="foul__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="seychellier">     <i>seychellier</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="styver">          <i>styver</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="registerton">     <i>registerton</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kymrer">          <i>kymrer</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dollar">          <i>dollar</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="megaton">         <i>megaton</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="optiker">         <i>optiker</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="realia">          <i>realia</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ton">             <i>ton</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tandtekniker">    <i>tandtekniker</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="cowboy">          <i>cowboy</i><par n="foul__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="comorier">        <i>comorier</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="relativpronomen"> <i>relativpronom</i><par n="nom/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="krypin">          <i>krypin</i><par n="ton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kiropraktiker">   <i>kiropraktiker</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pronomen">        <i>pronom</i><par n="nom/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="spin-off">        <i>spin-off</i><par n="foul__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="grenadier">       <i>grenadier</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="malier">          <i>malier</i><par n="lire__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="parallellogram">  <i>parallellogram</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kraftparallellogram"><i>kraftparallellogram</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="organum">         <i>organ</i><par n="organ/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="väggmadam">       <i>väggmadam</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gem">             <i>gem</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="madam">           <i>madam</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="roddarmadam">     <i>roddarmadam</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pandemonium">     <i>pandemoni</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="purgatorium">     <i>purgatori</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="delirium">        <i>deliri</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="klimakterium">    <i>klimakteri</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="status">          <i>status</i><par n="status__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="perihelium">      <i>periheli</i><par n="deliri/um__n_nt"/></e>
